Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Article 1. Commissioner’s Powers and Duties.

Administrative Code. —

For general operating and permit requirements, see 18 AAC 31, art. 1.

Sec. 17.20.005.
Powers and duties of commissioner.

To carry out the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner may issue orders, regulations, permits, quarantines, and embargoes relating to

food offered to the public or sold, including

inspection of meat, fish, poultry, and other food products;

standards of sanitation and handling methods for all phases of slaughtering, processing, storing, transporting, displaying, and selling;

labeling; and

the training, testing, and certification requirements for individuals who handle or prepare food, their supervisors, and their employers to ensure their knowledge of food safety and sanitation principles and requirements;

control and eradication of pests;

enforcement of hazard analysis critical control point programs for seafood processing that are developed in cooperation with appropriate industry representatives or, to the extent not inconsistent with this chapter or regulations adopted under the authority of this chapter, that are established by regulations of the United States Food and Drug Administration as they may periodically be revised;

labeling, subject to AS

17.20.013

, and grading of milk and milk products and standards of sanitation for dairies offering to the public or selling milk or milk products to at least the minimum of current recommendations of the United States Public Health Service pasteurized milk ordinance as it may periodically be revised;

standards and conditions for the operation and siting of aquatic farms and related hatcheries, including

restrictions on the use of chemicals; and

requirements to protect the public from contaminated aquatic farm products that pose a risk to health;

monitoring aquatic farms and aquatic farm products to ensure compliance with this chapter and, to the extent not inconsistent with this chapter or regulations adopted under the authority of this chapter, with the requirements of the national shellfish sanitation program manual of operations published by the United States Food and Drug Administration as it may periodically be revised;

tests and analyses that may be made and hearings that may be held to determine whether the commissioner will issue a stop order or quarantine;

transportation of, use of, disposal of, recalls of, or warnings concerning quarantined or embargoed items;

cooperation with federal and other state agencies.

History.

(§ 10 ch 72 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 68 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 151 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For federal regulations establishing requirements for hazard analysis and critical control point (HACCP) systems, see 9 C.F.R. Part 417.

Administrative Code. —

For food care, see 18 AAC 31, art. 2.

For management and personnel, see 18 AAC 31, art. 3.

For equipment and utensils, see 18 AAC 31, art. 4.

For sanitation and physical facilities, see 18 AAC 31, art. 5.

For temporary food service, limited food service, kiosks, mobile food units, see 18 AAC 31, art. 6.

For food processing, see 18 AAC 31, art. 7.

For markets, see 18 AAC 31, art. 8.

For milk and milk products, see 18 AAC 32, art. 1.

For reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32, art. 3.

For seafood processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 1.

For shellfish processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 2.

For smoked or smoke-flavored seafood products processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 3.

For thermal processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 4.

For direct-market fishing vessels, see 18 AAC 34, art. 5.

For requirements for fishing vessels, tender vessels, buying stations, and processing facilities in response to oil contamination, see 18 AAC 34, art. 6.

For direct-market land-based facilities, see 18 AAC 34, art. 7.